Utah statutes.
34-24-2.   Violation -- Penalty.
If any person blacklists or publishes, or causes to be blacklisted or
published, any employee discharged by any corporation, company or individual,
with the intent and for the purpose of preventing such employee from engaging
in or securing similar or other employment from any other corporation, company
or individual, or shall in any manner conspire or contrive by correspondence
or otherwise to prevent such discharged employee from securing employment,
such person is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not less than $55 nor
more than $1000 and imprisoned in the state prison not less than 60 days nor
more than one year.
